Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
Article 1 General Provisions

28-5-1.
Introduction of bills changing compensation for state officials.

Any bill making a change in the amount of the compensation or allowances of any elected or appointed state official or department or agency head must be introduced in the General Assembly during the first ten days of any session thereof. Any such bill introduced after the tenth day of any session shall not be considered or acted upon in any manner by either the Senate or the House of Representatives.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1212, § 1.

28-5-2.
Fiscal notes for bills changing compensation.

The chairman of any committee of either house of the General Assembly shall request the state auditor to prepare and furnish a fiscal note for each bill referred to such committee which would change the compensation or allowances of any elected or appointed state official, officer, or department or agency head. This Code section shall apply only if such compensation or allowances are to be paid either wholly or in part from state funds.

It shall be the duty of the state auditor to compile and furnish such fiscal notes as may be requested by the chairman of any committee of either house of the General Assembly. Such fiscal notes shall contain a statement of the present compensation and allowances of the official, officer, or department or agency head, any present longevity increments, and any personal expense allowances, other than mileage and travel expenses, and shall contain a statement of the proposed increase or change in such compensation, allowances, or increments, with the total cost of such changes. Such fiscal notes shall be printed by the Clerk of the House of Representatives or the Secretary of the Senate and shall be distributed to members of the General Assembly prior to a vote being taken on such bill in either house of the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1975, p. 770, § 1.

28-5-3.
Recording of votes on bills or resolutions fixing compensation or allowances of officials.

The “ayes” and “nays” shall be recorded upon each and every vote taken by each house of the General Assembly on any bill or resolution fixing the compensation or allowances of any official except county and municipal officials.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 476, § 1.

Cross references.

Manner of enactment of laws by General Assembly, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IV, Para. X and Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. V.

28-5-4.
Consideration of general appropriations bill.

The general appropriations bill shall be referred by the Speaker to the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives. In the event such bill is reported out of the Appropriations Committee as “do pass by substitute” or “do pass as amended,” neither the committee of the whole nor the House of Representatives shall consider the bill until at least 24 hours after the substitute or the amendments, as the case may be, have been printed and placed on the desk of each member.

History.

Ga. L. 1969, p. 680, § 1.

28-5-5.
[Reserved] Budgetary Responsibility Oversight Committee; members; duties; other entities to cooperate with committee; annual report; allowances; performance audits.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 2-1, effective January 28, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

28-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1914, § 18; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 28; Ga. L. 1995, p. 923, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 22/SB 49.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 28, effective May 12, 2008, added the “Reserved” designation.

28-5-6.
Powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office and the House Budget and Research Office.

The Senate is authorized to establish and provide for a Senate Budget and Evaluation Office. The House of Representatives is authorized to establish and provide for a House Budget and Research Office.

The director of the Senate Budget and Evaluation Office is authorized to request information and material from all state departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, authorities, and agencies in connection with his or her duties; and all such departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, authorities, and agencies are directed to furnish such information and material as the director shall request.

The director of the House Budget and Research Office is authorized to request information and material from all state departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, authorities, and agencies in connection with his or her duties; and all such departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, committees, authorities, and agencies are directed to furnish such information and material as the director shall request. All information and material received by the House Budget and Research Office under this subsection shall be made available to the chairpersons of the House Committee on Appropriations, the House Committee on Budget and Fiscal Affairs Oversight, and other officers of the House of Representatives as may be designated by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; and upon direction by such chairpersons and such other officers of the House as may be designated by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the House Budget and Research Office shall request any needed information and material from any state department, board, bureau, commission, committee, authority, or agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. VO1, § 1-14/HB 529; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 28/SB 340.